utilities/dictionaries/eu_EU-Basque.aff
FLAG num
SFX 188 0 duzue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 duzue .
SFX 188 0 duzue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 duzu .
SFX 188 0 duzu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 duzu .
SFX 188 0 duzu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 du .
SFX 188 0 du/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 du .
SFX 188 0 du/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gabiltza .
SFX 188 0 gabiltza/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzke .
SFX 188 0 gabilzke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkiake .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkiake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkieke .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkie .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkie/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkik .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkinake .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkinake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkin .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkioke .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkio .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkio/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkizueke .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkizueke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkizue .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkizuke .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkizuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkizu .
SFX 188 0 gabilzkizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkiake .
SFX 188 0 gagozkiake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkieke .
SFX 188 0 gagozkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkie .
SFX 188 0 gagozkie/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkik .
SFX 188 0 gagozkik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkinake .
SFX 188 0 gagozkinake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkin .
SFX 188 0 gagozkin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkioke .
SFX 188 0 gagozkioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkio .
SFX 188 0 gagozkio/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkizueke .
SFX 188 0 gagozkizueke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkizue .
SFX 188 0 gagozkizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkizuke .
SFX 188 0 gagozkizuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gagozkizu .
SFX 188 0 gagozkizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gaitezke .
SFX 188 0 gaitezke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gaitez .
SFX 188 0 gaitua/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gaitua/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gaituk .
SFX 188 0 gaituk/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gaituk .
SFX 188 0 gaituk/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gaituna/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gaituna/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gaitun .
SFX 188 0 gaitun/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gaitun .
SFX 188 0 gaitun/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gaituzte .
SFX 188 0 gaituzte/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gaituzte .
SFX 188 0 gaituzte/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gaituzue .
SFX 188 0 gaituzue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gaituzue .
SFX 188 0 gaituzue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gaituzu .
SFX 188 0 gaituzu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gaituzu .
SFX 188 0 gaituzu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gaitu .
SFX 188 0 gaitu/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gaitu .
SFX 188 0 gaitu/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gaitzakea/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gaitzakek .
SFX 188 0 gaitzakek/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gaitzakena/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gaitzaken .
SFX 188 0 gaitzaken/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gaitzakete .
SFX 188 0 gaitzakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gaitzakezue .
SFX 188 0 gaitzakezue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gaitzakezu .
SFX 188 0 gaitzakezu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gaitzake .
SFX 188 0 gaitzake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gaitzak .
SFX 188 0 gaitzan .
SFX 188 0 gaitzate .
SFX 188 0 gaitzazue .
SFX 188 0 gaitzazu .
SFX 188 0 gaitza .
SFX 188 0 gakartzak .
SFX 188 0 gakartzan .
SFX 188 0 gakartzate .
SFX 188 0 gakartzate/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gakartzazue .
SFX 188 0 gakartzazue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gakartzazu .
SFX 188 0 gakartzazu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gakartza .
SFX 188 0 gakartza/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gakizkiake .
SFX 188 0 gakizkiake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gakizkieke .
SFX 188 0 gakizkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gakizkie .
SFX 188 0 gakizkie/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gakizkie .
SFX 188 0 gakizkik .
SFX 188 0 gakizkinake .
SFX 188 0 gakizkinake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gakizkin .
SFX 188 0 gakizkioke .
SFX 188 0 gakizkioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gakizkio .
SFX 188 0 gakizkio/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gakizkio .
SFX 188 0 gakizkizueke .
SFX 188 0 gakizkizueke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gakizkizue .
SFX 188 0 gakizkizuke .
SFX 188 0 gakizkizuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gakizkizu .
SFX 188 0 gakuskia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gakuskik .
SFX 188 0 gakuskik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gakuskina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gakuskin .
SFX 188 0 gakuskin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gakuskite .
SFX 188 0 gakuskite/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gakuskizue .
SFX 188 0 gakuskizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gakuskizu .
SFX 188 0 gakuskizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gakuski .
SFX 188 0 gakuski/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 garabiltzak .
SFX 188 0 garabiltzan .
SFX 188 0 garabiltzate .
SFX 188 0 garabiltzate/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garabiltzazue .
SFX 188 0 garabiltzazue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garabiltzazu .
SFX 188 0 garabiltzazu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garabiltza .
SFX 188 0 garabiltza/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garamatzak .
SFX 188 0 garamatzana/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 garamatzan .
SFX 188 0 garamatzan/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 garamatzate .
SFX 188 0 garamatzate/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garamatzazue .
SFX 188 0 garamatzazue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garamatzazu .
SFX 188 0 garamatzazu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garamatza .
SFX 188 0 garamatza/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gara .
SFX 188 0 gara .
SFX 188 0 gare/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gare/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garoatzaa/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 garoatzak .
SFX 188 0 garoatzak/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 garoatzana/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 garoatzan .
SFX 188 0 garoatzan/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 garoatzate .
SFX 188 0 garoatzate/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garoatzazue .
SFX 188 0 garoatzazue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garoatzazu .
SFX 188 0 garoatzazu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garoatza .
SFX 188 0 garoatza/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garraizkia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 garraizkie .
SFX 188 0 garraizkie/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garraizkik .
SFX 188 0 garraizkik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 garraizkina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 garraizkin .
SFX 188 0 garraizkin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 garraizkio .
SFX 188 0 garraizkio/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garraizkizue .
SFX 188 0 garraizkizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 garraizkizu .
SFX 188 0 garraizkizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatozke .
SFX 188 0 gatozke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkiake .
SFX 188 0 gatozkiake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkieke .
SFX 188 0 gatozkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkie .
SFX 188 0 gatozkie/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkik .
SFX 188 0 gatozkik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkinake .
SFX 188 0 gatozkinake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkin .
SFX 188 0 gatozkin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkioke .
SFX 188 0 gatozkioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkio .
SFX 188 0 gatozkio/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkizueke .
SFX 188 0 gatozkizueke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkizue .
SFX 188 0 gatozkizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkizuke .
SFX 188 0 gatozkizuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gatozkizu .
SFX 188 0 gatozkizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatoz .
SFX 188 0 gatoz/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkie .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkie/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkik .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkin .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkio .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkio/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkizue .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkizu .
SFX 188 0 gatxezkizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkie .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkie/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkie .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkie/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkik .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkik .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkik/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkin .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkin .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkio .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkio/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkio .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkio/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkizue .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkizue .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkizu .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkizu .
SFX 188 0 gatzaizkizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gaudeke .
SFX 188 0 gaudeke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 gaude .
SFX 188 0 gaude/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gautza .
SFX 188 0 gautza/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gauzkak .
SFX 188 0 gauzkan .
SFX 188 0 gauzkate .
SFX 188 0 gauzkate/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gauzkazue .
SFX 188 0 gauzkazue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gauzkazu .
SFX 188 0 gauzkazu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gauzka .
SFX 188 0 gauzka/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gazaguzkik .
SFX 188 0 gazaguzkina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 gazaguzkin .
SFX 188 0 gazaguzkin/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 gazaguzkite .
SFX 188 0 gazaguzkite/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gazaguzkizue .
SFX 188 0 gazaguzkizue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gazaguzkizu .
SFX 188 0 gazaguzkizu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 gazaguzki .
SFX 188 0 gazaguzki/1,398 .
